Nebraska, session 109, LB1167.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1167 LB1167
2026 2026
Section 1. Laws 2025, LB261, section 246, is amended to read:
Sec. 246. AGENCY NO. 72 — DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Program No. 603 - Industrial Recruitment
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 15,718,538 15,805,071
CASH FUND 33,019,625 7,525,784
FEDERAL FUND est. 21,183,754 21,188,298
PROGRAM TOTAL 69,921,917 44,519,153
SALARY LIMIT 4,603,821 4,733,987
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance for unexpended
obligations existing on June 30, 2025, for the Site and Building
Development Act, is hereby reappropriated.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$11,020,352 General Funds, $31,839,197 Cash Funds, and $20,737,571
Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $11,020,352 General Funds, $6,339,197 Cash Funds, and
$20,737,571 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose. The department shall use the $11,020,352 General
Funds appropriated for FY2026-27 for state aid to award grants under the
Business Innovation Act. It is the intent of the Legislature that of the
$11,020,352 General Funds appropriated for FY2026-27 for state aid,
$3,000,000 shall be used for awarding grants and technical assistance
under the Business Innovation Act for the microenterprise assistance
program.
It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate an additional
$4,500,000 Cash Funds from the Site and Building Development Fund in
FY2027-28 pursuant to subdivision (1)(h) of section 81-12,147.
Sec. 2. Original Laws 2025, LB261, section 246, is repealed.
-2-